Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-192
Credential; disciplinary action; director; sanctions; powers.

(1) If the director determines upon completion of a hearing under section 38-183 or 38-186 that a violation has occurred, the director may, at his or her discretion, consult with the appropriate board concerning sanctions to be imposed or terms and conditions of the sanctions. When the director consults with a board, the credential holder and the Attorney General shall be provided with a copy of the director's request, the recommendation of the board, and an opportunity to respond in such manner as the director determines.

(2) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, the director shall have the authority through entry of an order to exercise in his or her discretion any or all of the sanctions authorized under subsection (1) of section 38-196.

(3) If the director determines upon completion of a hearing under section 38-183 or 38-186 that a licensee has performed or induced an unlawful abortion in violation of section 71-6915, the director shall enter an order imposing a sanction authorized under subsection (2) of section 38-196.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 92;

Laws 2023, LB574, § 9.